Tennessee, session 114, HB2598.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. The commissioner of health shall use existing resources to conduct a
study of neighboring states to determine the level of independent practice provided to certified
nurse midwives. The purpose of the study is to examine the varying levels of practice
independence that may or may not be granted to certified nurse midwives in neighboring states.
The commissioner shall compile the findings of the study and any recommendations the
commissioner may have in a report and transmit the report no later than December 31, 2026, to
the chief clerk of the senate, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, and the legislative
librarian. Publication and transmission of the report may be accomplished by electronic means.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2598
012329
- 1 -